Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB364.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The General Assembly declares that the sole and uniform legal standard of time throughout this Commonwealth, including municipalities of this Commonwealth, shall be Atlantic standard time and that daylight saving time shall not be used as a standard of time.Section 2. Section 1 of the act of April 13, 1887 (P.L.21, No.18), entitled "An act for the establishment of a uniform standard of time throughout the Commonwealth," is amended to read:Section 1. Be it enacted, &c., That (a) on and after the first day of July, Anno Domini one thousand eight hundred and eighty-seven, the mean solar time of the [seventy-fifth] sixtieth meridian of longitude west of Greenwich, commonly 12345678910111213141516171819 called [eastern] Atlantic standard time, shall be the sole and uniform legal standard of time throughout this Commonwealth; and on and after the date aforesaid all days shall everywhere be taken to begin and end in accordance with said standard; and every mention of, or reference to, any hour or time in any and all existing future acts of Assembly, municipal ordinances, and corporate bylaws, in any and all existing or future rules or regulations adopted by any public officer or official board, in any and all rules of the courts of the Commonwealth or any of them, whether standing or special, and whether now in force or hereafter to be promulgated, in any and all orders, judgments and decrees of said courts of any of them, and judgments and sentences of magistrates pronounced or entered on or after the date aforesaid, in any and all contracts, deeds, wills, and notices, and in the transaction of all matters of business, public, legal, commercial, or otherwise,--shall be construed with reference to, and in accordance with, the said standard hereby adopted, unless a different standard is therein expressly provided for: Provided, however, That this act shall not operate to impose upon any person any forfeiture of rights, or subject him to the consequences of any default, by reason of any failure, occurring prior to the date aforesaid, to comply with the requirement of, or do any act under or in pursuance of any law, ordinance, contract, notice, deed, will, regulation, rule, order, judgment, sentence, or decree, if such person shall, before the said date, have properly done the act or acts which would be requisite to save such forfeiture or prevent such default had this law not been enacted: And provided, further, That when the standard time shall be advanced, for any portion of the year, by any act of Congress, now in force or hereafter 20250SB0364PN0314 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 passed, the time so fixed by such act of Congress shall be the standard time of this Commonwealth for such portion of the year: And provided, That no county, city, borough, town, township, or other municipal subdivision of the Commonwealth shall, by ordinance, resolution, or rule, adopt a different standard of time for any year, or any portion of the year, than that herein provided; and all ordinances, resolutions and rules heretofore adopted, contrary to this proviso, are declared to be void and of no effect.[(b) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (a), the standard of time in this State, between 2 o'clock antemeridian on the last Sunday in April and 2 o'clock antemeridian on the last Sunday in October of each year, shall be one hour in advance of that prescribed above, commonly known as daylight saving time.]Section 3. If more than one state contiguous to the Commonwealth of Pennsylvania enacts a law directing a state official to request the United States Secretary of Transportation to place that state in the Atlantic time zone, the Governor shall transmit a similar request on behalf of the Commonwealth of Pennsylvania.Section 4. If the United States Secretary of Transportation approves the request of the Governor, the Governor shall transmit a notice to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin.Section 5. The amendment of section 1(b) of the act shall apply to calendar years beginning on and after the effective date of this section.Section 6. This act shall take effect as follows:20250SB0364PN0314 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) The amendment of section 1(a) of the act shall take effect on the first Sunday in November following publication of the notice required under section 4 of this act.(2) The amendment of section 1(b) of the act shall take effect on the Monday after the last Sunday in October following the effective date of this section.(3) The remainder of this act shall take effect immediately.20250SB0364PN0314 - 4 - 12345678